xapian-core/languages/french.sbl
// Alias: fr

routines (
           prelude postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2
           standard_suffix
           i_verb_suffix
           verb_suffix
           residual_suffix
           un_double
           un_accent
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v keep_with_s )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a^   '{U+00E2}'  // a-circumflex
stringdef a`   '{U+00E0}'  // a-grave
stringdef c,   '{U+00E7}'  // c-cedilla

stringdef e"   '{U+00EB}'  // e-diaeresis (rare)
stringdef e'   '{U+00E9}'  // e-acute
stringdef e^   '{U+00EA}'  // e-circumflex
stringdef e`   '{U+00E8}'  // e-grave
stringdef i"   '{U+00EF}'  // i-diaeresis
stringdef i^   '{U+00EE}'  // i-circumflex
stringdef o^   '{U+00F4}'  // o-circumflex
stringdef u^   '{U+00FB}'  // u-circumflex
stringdef u`   '{U+00F9}'  // u-grave

define v 'aeiouy{a^}{a`}{e"}{e'}{e^}{e`}{i"}{i^}{o^}{u^}{u`}'

define prelude as repeat goto (

    (  v [ ('u' ] v <- 'U') or
           ('i' ] v <- 'I') or
           ('y' ] <- 'Y')
    )
    or
    (  [ '{e"}' ] <- 'He' )
    or
    (  [ '{i"}' ] <- 'Hi' )
    or
    (  ['y'] v <- 'Y' )
    or
    (  'q' ['u'] <- 'U' )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit  // defaults

    do (
        ( v v next )
        or
        among ( // this exception list begun Nov 2006
            'par'  // paris, parie, pari
            'col'  // colis
            'tap'  // tapis
            // extensions possible here
        )
        or
        ( next gopast v )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'I' (<- 'i')
        'U' (<- 'u')
        'Y' (<- 'y')
        'He' (<- '{e"}')
        'Hi' (<- '{i"}')
        'H' (delete)
        ''  (next)
    )
)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define standard_suffix as (
        [substring] among(

            'ance' 'iqUe' 'isme' 'able' 'iste' 'eux'
            'ances' 'iqUes' 'ismes' 'ables' 'istes'
               ( R2 delete )
            'atrice' 'ateur' 'ation'
            'atrices' 'ateurs' 'ations'
               ( R2 delete
                 try ( ['ic'] (R2 delete) or <-'iqU' )
               )
            'logie'
            'logies'
               ( R2 <- 'log' )
            'usion' 'ution'
            'usions' 'utions'
               ( R2 <- 'u' )
            'ence'
            'ences'
               ( R2 <- 'ent' )
            'ement'
            'ements'
            (
                RV delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'iv'   (R2 delete ['at'] R2 delete)
                        'eus'  ((R2 delete) or (R1<-'eux'))
                        'abl' 'iqU'
                               (R2 delete)
                        'i{e`}r' 'I{e`}r'      //)
                               (RV <-'i')      //)--new 2 Sept 02
                    )
                )
            )
            'it{e'}'
            'it{e'}s'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'abil' ((R2 delete) or <-'abl')
                        'ic'   ((R2 delete) or <-'iqU')
                        'iv'   (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'if' 'ive'
            'ifs' 'ives'
            (
                R2 delete
                try ( ['at'] R2 delete ['ic'] (R2 delete) or <-'iqU' )
            )
            'eaux' (<- 'eau')
            'aux'  (R1 <- 'al')
            'euse'
            'euses'((R2 delete) or (R1<-'eux'))

            'issement'
            'issements'(R1 non-v delete) // verbal

            // fail(...) below forces entry to verb_suffix. -ment typically
            // follows the p.p., e.g 'confus{e'}ment'.

            'amment'   (RV fail(<- 'ant'))
            'emment'   (RV fail(<- 'ent'))
            'ment'
            'ments'    (test(v RV) fail(delete))
                       // v is e,i,u,{e'},I or U
        )
    )

    define i_verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among (
            '{i^}mes' '{i^}t' '{i^}tes' 'i' 'ie' 'ies' 'ir' 'ira' 'irai'
            'iraIent' 'irais' 'irait' 'iras' 'irent' 'irez' 'iriez'
            'irions' 'irons' 'iront' 'is' 'issaIent' 'issais' 'issait'
            'issant' 'issante' 'issantes' 'issants' 'isse' 'issent' 'isses'
            'issez' 'issiez' 'issions' 'issons' 'it'
                (not 'H' non-v delete)
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among (
            'ions'
                (R2 delete)

            '{e'}' '{e'}e' '{e'}es' '{e'}s' '{e`}rent' 'er' 'era' 'erai'
            'eraIent' 'erais' 'erait' 'eras' 'erez' 'eriez' 'erions'
            'erons' 'eront' 'ez' 'iez'

            // 'ons' //-best omitted

                (delete)

            '{a^}mes' '{a^}t' '{a^}tes' 'a' 'ai' 'aIent' 'ais' 'ait' 'ant'
            'ante' 'antes' 'ants' 'as' 'asse' 'assent' 'asses' 'assiez'
            'assions'
                (delete
                 try(['e'] delete)
                )
        )
    )

    define keep_with_s 'aiou{e`}s'

    define residual_suffix as (
        try(['s'] test ('Hi' or non-keep_with_s) delete)
        setlimit tomark pV for (
            [substring] among(
                'ion'           (R2 's' or 't' delete)
                'ier' 'i{e`}re'
                'Ier' 'I{e`}re' (<-'i')
                'e'             (delete)
            )
        )
    )

    define un_double as (
        test among('enn' 'onn' 'ett' 'ell' 'eill') [next] delete
    )

    define un_accent as (
        atleast 1 non-v
        [ '{e'}' or '{e`}' ] <-'e'
    )
)

define stem as (

    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (

        do (
            (
                 ( standard_suffix or
                   i_verb_suffix or
                   verb_suffix
                 )
                 and
                 try( [ ('Y'   ] <- 'i' ) or
                        ('{c,}'] <- 'c' )
                 )
            ) or
            residual_suffix
        )

        // try(['ent'] RV delete) // is best omitted

        do un_double
        do un_accent
    )
    do postlude
)
